Maryland, session 2025, SB0733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article II – Executive Department
1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0733*

SENATE BILL 733
The executive power of the State shall be vested in a Governor, whose term of office
shall commence on the third Wednesday of January next ensuing [his] THE GOVERNOR’S
election, and continue for four years, and until [his] THE GOVERNOR’S successor shall
have qualified; and a person who has served two consecutive popular elective terms of office
as Governor shall be ineligible to succeed [himself] THEMSELF as Governor for the term
immediately following the second of said two consecutive popular elective terms.
1A.
There shall be a Lieutenant Governor, who shall have only the duties delegated to
[him] THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR by the Governor and shall have such compensation
as the General Assembly shall provide by law, except that beginning in the year 1978 the
salary of the Lieutenant Governor shall be as provided under Section 21A of this Article.
No person who is ineligible under this Constitution to be elected Governor shall be eligible
to hold the office of Lieutenant Governor.
1B.
Each candidate who shall seek a nomination for Governor, under any method
provided by law for such nomination, including primary elections, shall at the time of filing
for said office designate a candidate for Lieutenant Governor, and the names of the said
candidate for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be listed on the primary election
ballot, or otherwise considered for nomination jointly with each other. No candidate for
Governor may designate a candidate for Lieutenant Governor to contest for the said offices
jointly with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR without the consent of the said
candidate for Lieutenant Governor, and no candidate for Lieutenant Governor may
designate a candidate for Governor, to contest jointly for said offices with [him] THE
CANDIDATE FOR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR without the consent of the said candidate for
Governor, said consent to be in writing on a form provided for such purpose and filed at the
time the said candidates shall file their certificates of candidacy, or other documents by
which they seek nomination. In any election, including a primary election, candidates for
Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be listed jointly on the ballot, and a vote cast for
the candidate for Governor shall also be cast for Lieutenant Governor jointly listed on the
ballot with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR, and the election of Governor, or the
nomination of a candidate for Governor, also shall constitute the election for the same term,
or the nomination, of the Lieutenant Governor who was listed on the ballot or was being
considered jointly with [him] THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR.
5.
A person to be eligible for the office of Governor or Lieutenant Governor must have
attained the age of thirty years, and must have been a resident and registered voter of the
State for five years next immediately preceding [his] THE CANDIDATE’S election.
9.

SENATE BILL 733 3
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall take care that the Laws are faithfully executed.
10.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall nominate, and, by and with the advice and consent of
the Senate, appoint all civil and military officers of the State, whose appointment, or
election, is not otherwise herein provided for, unless a different mode of appointment be
prescribed by the Law creating the office.
10A.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a Governor may not
appoint a person to an office in the Executive Branch of State Government during:
(1) The period between a primary election in which the Governor is not
renominated or is ineligible to succeed [himself] THEMSELF AS GOVERNOR and the
inauguration of the next succeeding Governor; or
(2) If the Governor is nominated in the primary election but defeated in the
general election, the period between the general election and the inauguration of the next
succeeding Governor.
(b) In an emergency during the periods described in subsection (a) of this section,
a Governor may appoint a person to an office in the Executive Branch that the Governor
has the power to fill on a temporary basis upon filing a statement of emergency with the
Secretary of State. Appointments made under this subsection are subject to the approval
of the next succeeding Governor, who may remove the temporary officeholder and appoint
a replacement.
11.
In case of any vacancy during the recess of the Senate, in any office which the
Governor has power to fill, [he] THE GOVERNOR shall appoint some suitable person to
said office, whose commission shall continue in force until the end of the next session of the
Legislature, or until some other person is appointed to the same office, whichever shall first
occur; and the nomination of the person thus appointed during the recess, or of some other
person in [his] THE PERSON’S place, shall be made to the Senate on the first day of the
next regular meeting of the Senate.
16.
The Governor shall convene the Legislature, or the Senate alone, on extraordinary
occasions; and whenever from the presence of an enemy, or from any other cause, the seat
of Government shall become an unsafe place for the meeting of the Legislature, [he] THE
GOVERNOR may direct their sessions to be held at some other convenient place.

SENATE BILL 733
19.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall, from time to time, inform the Legislature of the
condition of the State and recommend to their consideration such measures as [he] THE
GOVERNOR may judge necessary and expedient.
20.
[He] THE GOVERNOR shall have power to grant reprieves and pardons, except in
cases of impeachment, and in cases, in which [he] THE GOVERNOR is prohibited by other
Articles of this Constitution; and to remit fines and forfeitures for offences against the
State; but shall not remit the principal or interest of any debt due the State, except, in cases
of fines and forfeitures; and before granting a nolle prosequi, or pardon, [he] THE
GOVERNOR shall give notice, in one or more newspapers, of the application made for it,
and of the day on, or after which, [his] THE GOVERNOR’S decision will be given; and in
every case, in which [he] THE GOVERNOR exercises this power, [he] THE GOVERNOR
shall report to either Branch of the Legislature, whenever required, the petitions,
recommendations and reasons, which influenced [his] THE GOVERNOR’S decision.
21.
The Governor shall reside at the seat of government, and, from and after the fourth
Wednesday in January 1967, shall receive for [his] THE GOVERNOR’S services an annual
salary of twenty–five thousand dollars, except that beginning in the year 1978 the salary
of the Governor shall be as provided in Section 21A of this Article.
22.
A Secretary of State shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and
consent of the Senate, who shall continue in office, unless sooner removed by the Governor,
till the end of the official term of the Governor from whom [he] THE SECRETARY OF
STATE received [his] THE SECRETARY OF STATE’S appointment, and receive such
annual salary as the General Assembly may from time to time by law prescribe.
23.
The Secretary of State shall carefully keep and preserve a Record of all official acts
and proceedings, which may at all times be inspected by a committee of either Branch of
the Legislature; and [he] THE SECRETARY OF STATE shall perform such other duties as
may be prescribed by Law, or as may properly belong to [his] THE SECRETARY OF
STATE’S office, together with all clerical duty belonging to the Executive Department.
Article V – Attorney–General and State’s Attorneys
1.

SENATE BILL 733 5
There shall be an Attorney–General elected by the qualified voters of the State, on
general ticket, on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in the month of November,
nineteen hundred and fifty–eight, and on the same day, in every fourth year thereafter,
who shall hold [his] THE office OF ATTORNEY GENERAL for four years from the time of
[his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S election and qualification, and until [his] THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL’S successor is elected and qualified, and shall be re–eligible thereto,
and shall be subject to removal for incompetency, willful neglect of duty or misdemeanor in
office, on conviction in a Court of Law.
3.
(a) The Attorney General shall:
(1) Prosecute and defend on the part of the State all cases pending in the
appellate courts of the State, in the Supreme Court of the United States or the inferior
Federal Courts, by or against the State, or in which the State may be interested, except
those criminal appeals otherwise prescribed by the General Assembly.
(2) Investigate, commence, and prosecute or defend any civil or criminal
suit or action or category of such suits or actions in any of the Federal Courts or in any
Court of this State, or before administrative agencies and quasi legislative bodies, on the
part of the State or in which the State may be interested, which the General Assembly by
law or joint resolution, or the Governor, shall have directed or shall direct to be
investigated, commenced and prosecuted or defended.
(3) When required by the General Assembly by law or joint resolution, or
by the Governor, aid any State’s Attorney or other authorized prosecuting officer in
investigating, commencing, and prosecuting any criminal suit or action or category of such
suits or actions brought by the State in any Court of this State.
(4) Give [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S opinion in writing whenever
required by the General Assembly or either branch thereof, the Governor, the Comptroller,
the Treasurer or any State’s Attorney on any legal matter or subject.
(b) The Attorney General shall have and perform any other duties and possess
any other powers, and appoint the number of deputies or assistants, as the General
Assembly from time to time may prescribe by law.
(c) The Attorney General shall receive for [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
services the annual salary as the General Assembly from time to time may prescribe by
law, but [he] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL may not receive any fees, perquisites or rewards
whatever, in addition to [his] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S salary, for the performance of
any official duty.
(d) The Governor may not employ any additional counsel, in any case whatever,
unless authorized by the General Assembly.

SENATE BILL 733
Article VI – Treasury Department
1.
(a) There shall be a Treasury Department, consisting of a Comptroller chosen by
the qualified electors of the State, who shall receive such salary as may be fixed by law; and
a Treasurer, to be appointed on joint ballot by the two Houses of the Legislature at each
regular session in which begins the term of the Governor, who shall receive such salary as
may be fixed by law.
(b) The terms of office of the Comptroller and Treasurer shall be for four years,
and until their successors shall qualify; and neither of the officers shall be allowed, or
receive any fees, commissions or perquisites of any kind in addition to [his salary] THEIR
SALARIES for the performance of any duty or services whatsoever.
(c) (1) In case of a vacancy in the office of the Comptroller by death or
otherwise, the Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall fill such
vacancy by appointment as provided in this subsection.
(2) The Governor shall appoint one of three individuals whose names are
submitted to the Governor in writing, within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy,
by the State Central Committee of the political party, if any, with which the vacating
Comptroller had been affiliated at the time of the Comptroller’s last election or
appointment.
(3) Each individual whose name is submitted to the Governor must have
been a registered voter affiliated with the political party of the vacating Comptroller on the
date immediately preceding the date on which the vacancy occurred.
(4) The Governor shall make the appointment within 15 days after names
are submitted by the State Central Committee of the appropriate political party.
(5) If names are not submitted by the State Central Committee of the
appropriate political party within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy, the Governor
shall appoint within another period of 15 days any qualified individual who was a
registered voter affiliated with the political party of the vacating Comptroller on the date
immediately preceding the date on which the vacancy occurred.
(6) If the vacating Comptroller was not affiliated with a political party at
the time of the Comptroller’s last election or appointment, the Governor shall appoint any
qualified individual within 15 days after the occurrence of the vacancy.
(7) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of this subsection, an individual
appointed under this subsection shall serve until a successor is elected under paragraph (9)
of this subsection to fill the remainder of the term.

SENATE BILL 733 7
(8) An individual appointed under this subsection shall serve for the
remainder of the term if the vacancy occurs after the date that is 21 days before the deadline
for filing certificates of candidacy for the regular statewide election that is held in the
second year of the term.
(9) If the vacancy occurs on or before the date that is 21 days before the
deadline for filing certificates of candidacy for the regular statewide election that is held in
the second year of the term, the Governor shall issue a proclamation immediately after the
occurrence of the vacancy declaring that a special primary election and a special general
election shall be held at the same time as the regular statewide primary election and
regular statewide general election that are held in the second year of the term.
(d) In case of a vacancy in the office of the Treasurer by death or otherwise, the
Deputy Treasurer shall act as Treasurer until the next regular or extraordinary session of
the Legislature following the creation of the vacancy, whereupon the Legislature shall
choose a successor to serve for the duration of the unexpired term of office.
(e) The Comptroller and the Treasurer shall keep their offices at the seat of
government, and shall take such oaths and enter into such bonds for the faithful discharge
of their duties as are now or may hereafter be prescribed by law.
2.
The Comptroller shall have the general superintendence of the fiscal affairs of the
State; [he] THE COMPTROLLER shall digest and prepare plans for the improvement and
management of the revenue, and for the support of the public credit; prepare and report
estimates of the revenue and expenditures of the State; superintend and enforce the prompt
collection of all taxes and revenue; adjust and settle, on terms prescribed by law, with
delinquent collectors and receivers of taxes and State revenue; preserve all public accounts;
and decide on the forms of keeping and stating accounts. [He] THE COMPTROLLER, or
such of [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the
Legislature, shall grant, under regulations prescribed by Law, all warrants for money to be
paid out of the Treasury, in pursuance of appropriations by law, and countersign all checks
drawn by the Treasurer upon any bank or banks in which the moneys of the State, may,
from time to time, be deposited. [He] THE COMPTROLLER shall prescribe the formalities
of the transfer of stock, or other evidence of the State debt, and countersign the same,
without which such evidence shall not be valid; [he] THE COMPTROLLER shall make to
the General Assembly full reports of all [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S proceedings, and of
the state of the Treasury Department within ten days after the commencement of each
session; and perform such other duties as shall be prescribed by law.
3.
The Treasurer shall receive the moneys of the State, and, until otherwise prescribed
by law, deposit them, as soon as received, to the credit of the State, in such bank or banks
as [he] THE TREASURER may, from time to time, with the approval of the Governor, select

SENATE BILL 733
(the said bank or banks giving security, satisfactory to the Governor, for the safekeeping
and forthcoming, when required of said deposits), and [he] THE TREASURER or such of
[his] THE TREASURER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the Legislature shall
disburse the same for the purposes of the State according to law, upon warrants drawn by
the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy, and on checks
countersigned by the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy.
The Legislature may prescribe, by law, for the Treasurer to disburse the moneys of the
State by a system other than by the use of checks. The Treasurer or such of [his] THE
TREASURER’S deputies as may be authorized to do so by the Legislature shall take receipts
for all moneys paid from the Treasury Department; and receipt for moneys received by
[him] THE TREASURER shall be endorsed upon warrants signed, by the Comptroller, or
such deputy as may be authorized to do so by law, without which warrants, so signed, no
acknowledgment of money received into the Treasury shall be valid; and upon warrants
issued by the Comptroller, or [his] THE COMPTROLLER’S duly authorized deputy, the
Treasurer shall make arrangements for the payment of the interest of the public debt, and
for the purchase thereof, on account of the sinking fund. Every bond, certificate, or other
evidence of the debt of the State shall be signed by the Treasurer, Chief Deputy Treasurer,
or a Deputy Treasurer, and countersigned by the Comptroller, Chief Deputy Comptroller,
or a Deputy Comptroller; and no new certificate or other evidence intended to replace
another shall be issued until the old one shall be delivered to the Treasurer, and authority
executed in due form for the transfer of the same filed in [his] THE TREASURER’S office,
and the transfer accordingly made on the books thereof, and the certificate or other
evidence cancelled; but the Legislature may make provisions for the loss of certificates, or
other evidences of the debt; and may prescribe, by law, the manner in which the Treasurer
shall receive and keep the moneys of the State.
4.
The Treasurer shall render [his] THE TREASURER’S Accounts, quarterly, to the
Comptroller; and shall publish, monthly, in such newspapers as the Governor may direct,
an abstract thereof, showing the amount of cash on hand, and the place, or places of deposit
thereof; and on the third day of each regular session of the legislature, he shall submit to
the Senate and House of Delegates fair and accurate copies of all Accounts by [him] THE
TREASURER, from time to time, rendered and settled with the Comptroller. [He] THE
TREASURER shall, at all times, submit to the Comptroller the inspection of the money in
[his] THE TREASURER’S hands, and perform all other duties that shall be prescribed by
Law.
5.
The Comptroller shall qualify, and enter on the duties of [his] THE
COMPTROLLER’S office, on the third Monday of January next succeeding the time of [his]
THE COMPTROLLER’S Election, or as soon thereafter as practicable. And the Treasurer
shall qualify within one month after [his] THE TREASURER’S appointment by the
Legislature.

SENATE BILL 733 9
6.
Whenever during the recess of the Legislature charges shall be preferred to the
Governor against the Comptroller or Treasurer, for incompetency, malfeasance in office,
willful neglect of duty, or misappropriation of the funds of the State, it shall be the duty of
the Governor forthwith to notify the party so charged, and fix a day for a hearing of said
charges; and if, in the case of the Comptroller, from the evidence taken, under oath, on said
hearing before the Governor, the said allegations shall be sustained, it shall be the duty of
the Governor to remove the Comptroller and appoint another in [his] THE
COMPTROLLER’S place, who shall hold the office for the unexpired term of the Comptroller
so removed. However, if, in the case of the Treasurer, from the evidence taken under oath
in the hearing before the Governor, the allegations are sustained, it is the duty of the
Governor to remove the Treasurer, and the deputy treasurer shall act as Treasurer until
the next regular or extraordinary session of the Legislature following the appointment,
whereupon a successor shall be chosen by the Legislature who shall serve for the unexpired
term of the Treasurer so removed.
Article IX – Militia and Military Affairs
2.
There shall be an Adjutant General, appointed by the Governor, by and with the
advice and consent of the Senate. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall hold [his] THE
office until the appointment and qualification of [his] A successor, or until removed in
pursuance of the sentence of a Court Martial. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall
perform such duties, and receive such compensation, or emoluments, as are now, or may be
prescribed by Law. [He] THE ADJUTANT GENERAL shall discharge the duties of [his]
THE office at the seat of Government, unless absent, under orders, on duty; and no other
officer of the General Staff of the Militia shall receive salary or pay, except when on service,
and mustered in with troops.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed

SENATE BILL 733
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.